Texas, session 891, HB81.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 91, Transportation Code, is amended by adding Subchapter G to read as follows: SUBCHAPTER G. HIGH-SPEED RAIL Sec. 91.130.  DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "high-speed rail" means intercity passenger rail service that is reasonably expected to reach speeds of at least 110 miles per hour. Sec. 91.131.  CONSTRUCTION OF HIGH-SPEED RAIL. The department shall enter into a comprehensive development agreement with a private entity to construct, maintain, and operate high-speed rail connecting Dallas to Waco to Austin to San Antonio along the Interstate Highway 35 corridor. SECTION 2.  Section 199.003, Transportation Code, is repealed. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.